Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB708.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8-DATTORNEY GENERAL NOTIFICATIONSection 801-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718192021 "Acquired entity." The entity, or portion of an entity, acquired under an agreement or transaction."Acquisition." An agreement, arrangement or activity the consummation of which results in a health care facility acquiring direct or indirect control of another health care facility . The term includes the acquisition of voting securities and noncorporate interests, including assets, capital stock or membership interests or equity interests."Against the public interest." A determination that an action is against the welfare or well-being of the general public of this Commonwealth."Agreement or transaction." An agreement or transaction as described under section 803-D(a)."Attorney General." The Office of Attorney General of the Commonwealth."Capital distribution." A payment made, liability incurred or other consideration given by a target firm health system to a health care facility for the purchase, acquisition, redemption, repurchase, payment or retirement of capital stock or other equity interest of the target firm health system or as a dividend, return of capital or other distribution in respect of the target firm health system's capital stock or other equity interest."Community health needs assessment." An assessment that complies with the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 501(r)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.)."Contracting affiliation." As follows:(1) The formation of a relationship between two or more entities that permits any of the following:20250SB0708PN0807 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The entities to negotiate jointly with carriers or third-party administrators over rates for professional medical services.(ii) One entity to negotiate on behalf of the other entity with carriers or third-party administrators over rates for professional medical services.(2) The term does not include an arrangement among entities under common ownership."Health care facility." As defined in section 103."Health system." As defined in section 809.2. "Material amount." An amount of the purchase price paid or total gross assets being acquired, whichever is higher, of:(1) $10,000,000 in a solo transaction; or(2) $35,000,000 in the aggregate during one calendar year."Material change." Any of the following:(1) The sale, transfer, lease or other encumbrance of a material amount of a health system's assets or operations, including real property, employment groups, emergency departments or other units. (2) A merger, an acquisition or a contracting affiliation with another health system that is valued at a material amount.(3) A capital distribution or similar reduction of a health system's equity capital by a material amount or the incursion of an obligation that commits the health system to making a capital distribution or similar reduction of equity by a material amount."Merger." A consolidation of two or more organizations, including two or more organizations joining through a common 20250SB0708PN0807 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parent organization, or two or more organizations forming a new organization. The term does not include a corporate reorganization."Person." As defined in 1 Pa.C.S. § 1991 (relating to definitions).Section 802-D. Notification . (a) General rule.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a person may not enter into an agreement or transaction involving a material change with another health care facility unless the first health care facility complies with the notification requirements under this chapter.(b) Exception.--An action prohibited under subsection (a) may be permitted when, as determined by the Attorney General, there is no feasible alternative to prevent a health system's closure or a greater loss of health services.Section 803-D. Filing.(a) Duty to file.--A health care facility shall file a notification in accordance with subsection (b) prior to entering into an agreement or transaction that results in a material change.(b) Waiting period.--A health system or provider organization shall undergo a waiting period prior to entering into an agreement or transaction, which shall:(1) begin on the date of receipt by the Attorney General of:(i) the notification required under subsection (c); or(ii) if notification is not completed, the notification to the extent completed and a statement of the reasons for noncompliance with subsection (c) from 20250SB0708PN0807 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 both persons; and(2) end:(i) forty-five days following the date of receipt under paragraph (1) for all agreements or transactions; or(ii) on a later date if extended as prescribed under section 806-D(2) . (c) Notice.--The notification of the transaction or agreement required under subsection (a) shall be submitted to the Attorney General on a form and in a manner developed by the Attorney General. The notification shall include all of the information required under 15 U.S.C. § 18a (relating to premerger notification and waiting period) and regulations promulgated under the law.(d) Additional information.--The Attorney General may require the submission of additional information or documentary material, including a community health needs assessment, from a health care facility required to file notification under subsection (b) , or from any officer, director, partner, agent or employee of the health care facility . (e) Right-to-Know Law.-- A document provided to the Attorney General under this chapter shall be exempt from inspection and copying under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(f) Confidentiality of and restrictions on use of materials.--The Attorney General may not use, as grounds for a prosecution or civil action unrelated to the transaction, materials provided to or disclosed under this act to the Attorney General.Section 804-D. Public hearings and notice.20250SB0708PN0807 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authority to conduct.-- Prior to the expiration of the respective waiting period under Federal law, along with any extension granted under Federal law, the Attorney General may conduct one or more public hearings on the proposed agreement or transaction.(b) Format.--A public hearing under subsection (a) shall be live-streamed on the Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website. A video recording of the public hearing shall be posted on the Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Specific entities.--If an agreement or transaction involves acquiring a health care facility , the Attorney General may hold a public hearing in any county in which the acquired entity is located to hear comments from interested parties. Interested parties shall include legal aid and health advocacy organizations within a county in which the acquired entity is located. The Attorney General may request testimony at a hearing from State agencies subject to section 807-D(b).(d) Notice.-- The Attorney General shall provide written notice of the date, time and place of the public hearing:(1) on the Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website;(2) through social and broadcast media;(3) through publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the affected community; and(4) to the governing body of each county in which the acquired entity is located.(e) Substantive changes to proposal.--If a substantive change in the agreement or transaction is submitted to the Attorney General after the initial public hearing, the Attorney 20250SB0708PN0807 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General may conduct an additional public hearing to hear comments from interested parties with respect to the change.Section 805-D. Determination and restraining prohibited transactions.(a) Material change against public interest.-- The Attorney General shall determine whether the proposed agreement or transaction is likely to create a material change that is against the public interest. (b) Action.--If the Attorney General determines that the proposed agreement or transaction is against the public interest under subsection (a), the Attorney General may commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin the agreement or transaction.(c) Licensing.--A State license of a health care facility may not be revoked, denied, impeded or cited for noncompliance due solely to a filing or review under this chapter.Section 806-D. Compliance and power of court.A health care facility , or any officer, director, partner, agent or employee of the health care facility , that substantially fails to comply with the notification requirement under this chapter or any request for the submission of additional information or documentary material under this chapter within the respective waiting period, the court may, in its discretion, do any or all of the following:(1) Order compliance.(2) Extend the waiting period until there has been substantial compliance.(3) Grant other equitable relief as the court determines necessary or appropriate.Section 807-D. Powers and duties of Attorney General.20250SB0708PN0807 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Rules and regulations.--The Attorney General, in consultation with the department, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out and enfor ce th is chapter. The Attorney General and the department shall ensure that the rules and regulations of the Office of Attorney General and the department are not in conflict.(b) Agency cooperation.--(1) T he department, the Department of Aging, the Department of Human Services and the Insurance Department shall assist the Attorney General in reviewing the proposed agreement and transaction, if requested, and shall promptly comply with any request for testimony or information.(2) The Attorney General may share information with the Insurance Department as may be permissibly necessary and appropriate for the Insurance Department to concurrently review a proposed transaction under Article XIV of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921. Documents provided by the Attorney General to the Insurance Department under this paragraph shall be treated as confidential and are not public records subject to inspection and copying under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 808-D. Nonapplicability.This chapter does not apply to a physician or psychiatric practice, whether a sole proprietorship, partnership, foundation or corporate entity of any kind.Section 809-D. Expiration.This act shall expire four years after the effective date of this section.Section 810-D. Study and report by Health Care Cost Containment 20250SB0708PN0807 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Council.Within three years of the effective date of this section, the Health Care Cost Containment Council, as authorized under 35 Pa.C.S. § 3309 (relating to special studies and reports), shall perform a study on the effects of this chapter and shall report its findings to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 811-D . Construction. This chapter shall not be construed to:(1) narrow, abrogate or otherwise alter the authority of the Attorney General to maintain competitive markets and prosecute or enforce violations of antitrust and unfair trade practices laws; or(2) prohibit any Federal agency, Commonwealth agency or other state agency from regulating an agreement or transaction or joining as party in an action seeking to enjoin an agreement or transaction , including the Insurance Department's jurisdiction to review an exposed transaction under Article XIV of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.Section 812 -D . Severability. The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application to any health care facility or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0708PN0807 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930